California statutes. Education Code
 school district or educational joint powers authority any attendance-related audit exception or exceptions involving state funds, and require the school district or educational joint powers authority to which the audit exceptions were directed to submit appropriate reporting forms for processing by the Superintendent.

(3) In the audit of a school district or educational joint powers authority for a subsequent year, the auditor shall review the correction or plan or plans of correction submitted by the school district or educational joint powers authority to determine if the exceptions have been resolved. If an exception has not been resolved, the auditor shall restate the exception in the audit report. After receiving a finding in an audit report, the Superintendent shall either consult with the school district or educational joint powers authority to resolve the exception or require the county superintendent of schools to follow up with the school district or educational joint powers authority.

(m) (1) (A) Each chartering authority shall be
 responsible for reviewing the audit exceptions contained in an audit of a charter school under its jurisdiction and determining whether the exceptions have been either corrected or an acceptable plan of correction has been developed.

(B) If a description of the corrections or plan of correction has not been provided as part of the audit required by this section, the chartering authority shall notify the charter school and request the governing body of the charter school to provide to the chartering authority a description of the correction or plan of correction on or before April 15.

(C) The chartering authority shall review the description of the correction or plan of correction and determine its adequacy. If the description of the correction or plan of correction is not adequate, the chartering authority shall require the charter school to resubmit that portion of its response
 that is inadequate.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), each chartering authority shall certify to the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the charter school is located, on or before May 15 of each year, that the chartering authority has done all of the following for the prior fiscal year:

(i) Reviewed all audits of charter schools under its jurisdiction.

(ii) Reviewed all exceptions that the charter school was required to review were reviewed, and that all of those exceptions, except as otherwise noted in the certification, have been corrected by the charter school or that an acceptable plan of correction has been submitted to the chartering authority.

(iii) Ensured that the charter schools they
 authorize have corrected or developed a plan of correction for exceptions identified in the audit report.

(iv) Identified any attendance-related audit exception or exceptions involving state funds and required the charter school to submit appropriate reporting forms for processing by the Superintendent.

(B) If the county board of education of the county in which the charter school is located is the chartering authority, the county board of education shall instead certify to the Superintendent, on or before June 15 each year, that the county superintendent of schools has done all of the following for the prior fiscal year:

(i) Reviewed all audits of charter schools under its jurisdiction.

(ii) Reviewed all exceptions that the charter school was required
 to review were reviewed, and that all of those exceptions, except as otherwise noted in the certification, have been corrected by the charter school or that an acceptable plan of correction has been submitted to the chartering authority.

(iii) Ensured that the charter school they authorize have corrected or developed a plan of correction for exceptions identified in the audit report.

(iv) Identified any attendance-related audit exception or exceptions involving state funds and required the charter school to submit appropriate reporting forms for processing by the Superintendent.

(3) (A) In the audit of a
 charter school for a subsequent year, the auditor shall review the correction or plan or plans of correction submitted by the charter school to determine if the exceptions have been resolved.

(B) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), if the exceptions identified in subparagraph (A) have not been corrected, the auditor shall restate the exception in the audit report.

(ii) After receiving a finding in an audit report pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k), the county superintendent of schools shall either consult with the charter school to resolve the exception or require the chartering authority to follow up with the charter school.

(C) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), if the exceptions identified in subparagraph (A) have not been corrected and the county board of education of the county in which the charter school is located is the chartering authority, the auditor shall restate the exception in the audit report.

(ii) After receiving an audit report pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k), the Superintendent shall consult with the charter school to resolve the exception or shall require the county board of education as the chartering authority to follow up with the charter school.

(4) (A) In the audit of a county superintendent of schools for a subsequent year, the auditor shall review the correction or plan or plans of correction submitted by the county superintendent of schools to determine if the exceptions have been resolved.

(B) If the exceptions identified in subparagraph (A) have not been resolved, the auditor shall restate the exception in the audit report.

(n) (1) The Superintendent shall review the audit
 exceptions contained in an audit of a county superintendent of schools and shall determine whether the exceptions have been corrected or an acceptable plan of correction has been developed.

(2) After receiving a final audit report of a county superintendent of schools or the county board of education, the Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(A) Review audit exceptions, including attendance exceptions or issues, that shall include, but not be limited to, those related to local control funding formula allocations pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 2574) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 1 and those related to independent study.

(B) Notify the county superintendent of schools and request the county superintendent of schools to provide to the Superintendent a description of the corrections or plan
 of correction within 60 days, but not later than June 15, after the Superintendent has been notified that a description of the correction or plan of correction has not been provided as part of the audit required by this section.

(C) Review the description of correction or plan of correction and determine its adequacy. If the description of the correction or plan of correction is not adequate, require the county superintendent of schools to resubmit that portion of its response that is inadequate.

(o) (1) The Superintendent is responsible for ensuring that local
 educational agencies have either corrected or developed plans of correction for any one or more of the following:

(A) All federal and state compliance audit exceptions identified in the audit.

(B) Exceptions that the county superintendent of schools certifies as of
 June 15 have not been corrected.

(C) Repeat audit exceptions that are not assigned to a county superintendent of schools to correct.

(2) In addition, the Superintendent is responsible for ensuring that county superintendents of schools and each county board of education that serves as the governing board or body
 of a local educational agency either correct all audit exceptions identified in the audits of county superintendents of schools and of the local educational agencies for which the county boards of education serve as the governing boards or develop acceptable plans of correction for those exceptions.

(3) The Superintendent shall report annually, on or before November 1, to the Controller on the Superintendent’s actions to ensure that school districts, county superintendents of schools, and each county board of education that serves as the governing board of a school district have either corrected or developed plans of correction for any of the exceptions noted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(p) To facilitate correction of the exceptions identified by the audits issued pursuant to this section, the Controller shall require auditors to categorize audit exceptions in each audit report in a manner that will make it clear to chartering authorities, the county superintendent of schools, and the Superintendent which exceptions they are responsible for ensuring the correction of by a local educational agency. In addition, the Controller annually
 shall select a sampling of
 chartering authorities and
 county superintendents of schools, perform a followup of the audit resolution process of those chartering authorities and county superintendents of schools, and report the results of that followup to the Superintendent, the chartering authorities, and the county superintendents of schools that were reviewed.

(q) County superintendents of
 schools shall adjust subsequent local property tax requirements to correct audit exceptions relating to local educational agency tax rates and tax revenues.

(r) If a governing board or body of a local educational agency, chartering authority, or county superintendent of schools fails or is unable to make satisfactory arrangements for the audit pursuant to this section, the Controller shall make arrangements for the audit and the cost of the audit shall be paid from local educational agency funds or the county school service fund, as the case may be.

(s) Audits of regional occupational centers and programs are subject to this section.

(t) This section does not authorize examination of, or reports on, the curriculum used or provided for in any local educational agency.

(u) Notwithstanding any other law, a nonauditing, management, or other consulting service to be provided to a local educational agency by a certified public accounting firm while the certified public accounting firm is performing an audit of the agency pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the generally accepted government auditing standards promulgated by the United States
 Government Accountability Office.

(v) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 39.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.1.

Reports of audits previously filed with the county clerk pursuant to Section 41020 shall be disposed of by the county clerk or returned to the respective superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1239, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.2.

(a) (1) If the governing board of a school district or educational joint powers authority has entered into a contract for an independent audit of its financial statements in accordance with Section 41020 and the audited financial statements have not been filed with the county superintendent of schools
 on or before the due date established under Section 41020, the county superintendent of schools shall investigate the causes for the delay and initiate one of the actions described in subdivision (c) that will provide the required audited financial statements in the most effective manner.

(2) If the governing body of a charter school has entered into a contract for an independent audit of its financial statements in accordance with Section 41020 and the audited financial statements have not been filed with the chartering authority on or before the due date established under Section 41020, the chartering authority shall investigate the causes for the delay and initiate one of the actions described in subdivision (c) that will provide the required audited financial statements in the most effective manner.

(3) If the county superintendent of schools has entered into a contract for an independent audit of its financial statements in accordance with Section 41020 and the audited financial statements have not been filed with the Superintendent and the Controller on or before the due date established under Section 41020, the Superintendent shall investigate the causes for the delay and initiate one of the actions described
 in subdivision (c) that will provide the required audited financial statements in the most effective manner.

(b) (1) (A) The county superintendent of schools may, after consultation with the governing board
 of the school district or educational joint powers authority
 and the auditors under contract to the school district or educational joint powers authority, and with the consent of the Controller’s office and the Superintendent, grant an appropriate extension for the completion of the audit and the filing of the audited financial statements. An extension does not waive the deadline established under Section 41020, but permits the filing of the report after the deadline.

(B) (i) The chartering authority may, after consultation with the governing body of the charter school and the auditors under contract to the charter school, and with the consent of the county superintendent of schools, the Controller’s office, and the Superintendent, grant an appropriate extension for the completion of the audit and the filing of the audited financial statements. An extension does not waive the deadline established under Section 41020, but permits the filing of the report after the deadline.

(ii) If a charter school has an approved audit extension pursuant to this subparagraph, a failure to file an audit on or before the legal deadline shall not be a cause for or contributing justification for charter nonrenewal or revocation. Failure to file an audit with the chartering authority on or before the legal deadline due to the inability of a
 charter school to contract for an audit due to market conditions of available auditors shall not be a cause for or contributing justification for charter nonrenewal or revocation.

(C) The Controller may, after consultation with the county superintendent of schools and the auditors under contract to the county superintendent of schools for the county office of education or for a charter school where the county board of education of the county in which the charter school is located is the chartering authority, and with the consent of the Superintendent, grant an appropriate extension for the completion of the audit and the filing of the audited financial statements. An extension does not waive the deadline established under Section 41020, but permits the filing of the report after the deadline.

(2) An extension granted pursuant to this subdivision shall be appropriate if the extension adheres to all of the following requirements:

(A) The local educational agency and the auditor have certified that the audit cannot be completed on time due to unforeseen circumstances or complex situations.

(B) An extension shall be the shortest amount of time reasonable given the extenuating circumstances justifying the
 extension.

(C) Extensions shall be in increments of no longer than
 30 calendar days.

(D) Extensions shall not be granted past March 31 following the deadline established under Section 41020.

(3) (A) As applicable pursuant to subdivision (a), the county superintendent of schools or the chartering authority may, after consultation with the
 governing board or body of a school district, educational joint powers authority, or charter school, the auditors under contract to the school district, educational joint powers authority, or charter school, and the Controller’s office, contract with another qualified certified public accountant or public accountant to obtain the required audited financial statements and charge the cost of the audit to the funds of the school district, educational joint powers authority, or charter school. The county superintendent of schools
 or the chartering authority, or the Controller shall, to the extent feasible, assist the school district, educational joint powers authority, or charter school in initiating action to avoid payment to the auditors under contract who did not complete the original audit.

(B) As applicable pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller may, after consultation with the county superintendent of schools, the auditors under contract to the county superintendent of schools, and the Superintendent, contract with another qualified certified public accountant or public accountant to obtain the required audited financial statements and
 charge the cost of the audit to the funds of the county superintendent of schools. The Controller shall, to the extent feasible, assist the county superintendent of schools in initiating action to avoid payment to the auditors under contract who did not complete the original audit.

 (4) As applicable pursuant to subdivision (a), the county superintendent of
 schools, the chartering authority, or the Superintendent may request the Controller’s office to investigate the situation and initiate action as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) If the audited financial statements required by Section 41020 have not been filed by
 a local educational agency with the Controller’s office on or before the due date established under Section 41020, the Controller’s office shall determine the most advantageous method of obtaining the required audited financial statements. The Controller’s office may, after consultation with the governing board or body of the local educational agency and the auditor under contract with the local educational agency, do any of the following:

(A) Accept the action of the county superintendent of
 schools, the chartering authority, or the Superintendent permitted by subdivision (b).

(B) Conduct the audit and prepare the auditor’s report, using the staff available within that office and charge the cost of the audit to the next
 regular apportionment from the State School Fund to the
 local educational agency.

(C) Contract with any qualified certified public accountant or public accountant, using the appropriate contracting procedures, for the conduct of the audit and preparation of the audited financial statements and charge the cost of the audit to the next regular apportionment from the State School Fund to the
 local educational agency.

(D) Consistent with the limits described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), grant a reasonable extension of the time for filing the report if, in the judgment of the Controller’s office, this will provide the required audited financial statements within the shortest time period. The extension of the time for filing does not waive the
 deadline established under Section 41020, but permits the filing of the report after the deadline.

(2) The Controller’s office shall consult with the governing board or body of the local educational agency, the auditors under contract to the
 local educational agency, and the county superintendent of schools or the chartering authority, as applicable, before making the determination of the method to be used in obtaining the audited financial statements. The Controller’s office shall, to the extent feasible, assist the local educational agency in initiating action to avoid payment to the auditors under contract who did not complete the original audit.

(d) Notwithstanding any extension granted under subdivision (b) or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the Controller’s office may determine at any time after the due date for filing of audit reports established by Section 41020 that the audited financial statements not yet filed with that office are delinquent and that the audit will be performed under subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) If an extension has not been requested or granted and the audited financial statements required by Section 41020 have not been filed by a local educational agency with the Controller’s office on or before the due date established under Section 41020, the local educational agency and the auditors under contract with the local educational agency shall notify the chartering authority, the county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent, and the Controller that the audit filing is delayed, the reasons for the delay, and the estimated filing date. The notification shall be made no later than 15 calendar days from the due date established under Section 41020.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Controller shall notify the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Department of Finance
 if local educational agencies are unable to contract for an audit due to market conditions of available auditors.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before September 30, 2028, and every three years thereafter, the Controller shall, in consultation with the entities listed in Section 14502.1, provide recommendations to the appropriate committees of the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, regarding outdated or ineffective audit requirements in statute.

(h) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 40.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.3.

(a) Within 45 days after the issuance of an audit report, the governing board or body of each local educational agency shall review, at a public meeting, the annual audit of the local educational agency for the prior year, any audit exceptions identified in that audit, the recommendations or findings of any management letter issued by the auditor, and any description of correction or plans to correct any exceptions or management letter issue.

(b) The review in subdivision (a) shall be placed on the agenda of the meeting pursuant to Section 35145 or 47604.1, as applicable. The action of the governing board or body of the local educational agency shall be to accept or reject the annual audit report.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 41.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.5.

(a) (1) If the Controller determines by two consecutive quality control reviews pursuant to Section 14504.2, or if the Superintendent, a chartering authority, or a county superintendent of schools determines, that audits performed by a certified public accountant or public accountant under Section 41020 were not performed in substantial conformity with provisions of the audit guide, or that the audit reports, including amended reports, submitted by February 15 following the close of the fiscal year audited, for two consecutive years do not conform to provisions of the audit guide as
 required by Section 14504, the
 Controller, the Superintendent, the chartering authority, or the county superintendent of schools, as appropriate, shall notify in writing the certified public accountant or public accountant and the California Board of Accountancy.

(2) If the certified public accountant or public accountant does not file an appeal in writing with the California Board of Accountancy within 30 calendar days after receipt of the notification from the
 Controller, the Superintendent, the chartering authority, or the county superintendent of schools, the determination of the Controller, the Superintendent, the chartering authority, or the county superintendent of schools pursuant to this section shall be final.

(b) If an appeal is filed with the California Board of Accountancy, the board shall complete an investigation of the appeal within 90 days of the filing date. On the basis of the investigation, the board may do either of the
 following:

(1) Find that the determination of the Controller, the Superintendent, the chartering authority, or the county superintendent of schools should not be upheld and has no effect.

(2) Schedule the appeal for a hearing, in which case, the final action on the appeal shall be completed by the board within one year from the date of filing the appeal.

(c) If the determination of the
 Controller, the Superintendent, the chartering authority, or the county superintendent of schools under subdivision (a) becomes final, the certified public accountant or public accountant shall be ineligible to conduct audits under Section 41020 for a period of three years, or, in the event of an appeal, for any period, and subject to the conditions, that may be ordered by the California Board of Accountancy. Not later than the first day of March of each year, the Controller shall notify each school district, educational joint powers authority, charter school, and county office of education of those certified public accountants or public accountants determined to
 be ineligible under this section. School
 districts, educational joint powers authorities, charter schools and county offices of education shall not use the audit services of a certified public accountant or public accountant ineligible under this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, “certified public accountant or public accountant” includes any person or firm entering into a contract to conduct an audit under Section 41020.

(e) This section does not preclude the California Board of Accountancy from taking any disciplinary action it deems appropriate under other
 laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 42.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.6.

(a) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall include instructions necessary to require, as part of supplementary information, or other information as deemed applicable under generally accepted auditing standards, schedules of all of the following for local educational agencies, as applicable:

(1) Pupil enrollment and attendance, including total pupil enrollment and attendance for each school month, and, if the local educational agency operates a multitrack year-round calendar, by track, and perform an analytical procedure and identify and disclose unusual increases or decreases in enrollment by month and track, if applicable, that are material and
 provide an opportunity for the local educational agency to provide an explanation in the note.

(2) The largest 25 aggregate payments or transfers of assets to individuals or organizations determined by value accumulated over the fiscal year.

(3) For school districts and county offices of education, pupil-to-teacher ratios for independent study programs.

(4) Loans with related entities or employees.

(5) For charter schools, governing body members and related entities.

(6) The five highest-paid employees.

(b) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance
 Reporting, the Controller shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, instructions necessary to require, at a minimum, that all of the following compliance procedures are performed in an audit of a local educational agency, except as otherwise limited:

(1) Compliance: compliance with professional accounting and auditing standards with an emphasis in the audit guide that annual audits of local educational agencies issued in compliance with the standards and requirements of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB) or Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB), as applicable, shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards (GAAS) and generally accepted government auditing standards.

(2) (A) Sample selection: where representative samples of pupils, pupil work product, financial transactions, or other sampling are
 required to be performed and selected, the auditor shall independently identify the sample and make that selection in a manner that cannot be predicted, in accordance with professional standards.

(B) Auditor transaction sampling shall include a sample size appropriate for the type of local educational agency pursuant to the test of compliance sample table in the Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting.

(C) Sampling of pupil enrollment, attendance, and instructional minutes shall be representative of and inclusive of all the local education agencies’ tracks and grade spans as applicable and in consideration of materiality levels established in the Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting.

(D) For an audit of a locally funded
 charter school that is governed by a school district or county office of education and that is included in the school district’s or county office of education’s audit, the auditor shall ensure that all samples completed are representative of each of the local educational agencies included in the audit.

(E) Audits shall ensure that samples from all payment sources are selected and shall verify that those payments are legal and have proper authorization. The sampling shall include, but is not limited to, payments made through a variety of sources such as credit cards, debit cards, and other electronic payment methods and media, and bank statements.

(3) Charter schools that are locally funded and governed by a school district or county office of education shall report charter school financial data separately from the general fund of the school district or county office of education.
 If the school district or county office of education audit includes more than one charter school, or if the charter school fund is not a major fund, the local educational agency shall also present financial data separately for each individual charter school in the supplemental section or footnotes of the audit report.

(4) Using appropriate sampling techniques, verify pupil enrollment for independent study programs at local educational agencies and verify that a pupil’s residence meets applicable residency requirements based on documentation provided by the parent or guardian of the pupil, emancipated pupil, or other custodian of the pupil, or, in the case of a pupil over 18 years of age, by the pupil.

(5) (A) Chartering authority input for audits of a charter school: require auditors to consult with and inquire of the chartering authority during planning
 stages of the audit of a charter school authorized by the chartering authority to assist the auditor in identifying potential audit risks, including, but not limited to, fiscal and compliance areas that the charter school may not meet expectations, potential fraud risks, irregularities in observations and reporting, and other background information pertinent to the audit.

(B) County office of education input for audits of a school district or educational joint powers authority: require auditors to consult with and inquire of the county office of education during planning stages of the audit of a school district or educational joint powers authority to assist the auditor in identifying potential audit risks, including, but not limited to, fiscal and compliance areas that the school district or educational joint powers authority may not meet expectations, potential fraud risks, irregularities in observations and reporting, and other background
 information pertinent to the audit.

(C) Department input for audits of a county office of education: require auditors to consult with and inquire of the department during planning stages of the audit of a county office of education to assist the auditor in identifying potential audit risks, including, but not limited to, fiscal and compliance areas that the county office of education may not meet expectations, potential fraud risks, irregularities in observations and reporting, and other background information pertinent to the audit.

(6) (A) Related entity for audits of a charter school: determining if a related entity, such as a charter management organization, education management organization, or similar third party with financial, economic, or controlling membership interest, exists with the charter school, as defined by generally accepted accounting
 principles. A charter school that files a federal tax return shall include all related entities identified on the federal tax return in the disclosure required by this paragraph.

(B) If a relationship is determined to exist pursuant to subparagraph (A), evaluate the level of the relationship to determine if it is material. For purposes of materiality, determine if the related party has a material financial, economic, or controlling interest in the charter school or can exercise material control, such as common management or board, majority voting interest, or sole corporate or statutory member or other arrangement.

(7) (A) Verification: For a charter school, verify if more than 20 percent of the charter school’s total average daily attendance was generated through independent study, pursuant to Section 47634.2.

(B) Verify the pupil-to-teacher ratio calculation. For independent study programs at school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools, verify the average daily attendance-to-full-time equivalent certificated employee ratio calculations for independent study programs comply with Section 51745.6.

(8) Identify any transfers of funds or assets to other individuals or organizations that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) or 10 percent of the local educational agency’s total revenue and other sources, whichever is less, together with a written explanation from the local educational agency regarding the local educational
 agency’s purpose for each of those transfers of funds or assets.

(9) Charter School Oversight: Ensure the chartering authority has documentation of completing the oversight tasks in Section 47604.32 and teacher assignment monitoring pursuant to Section 44258.9.

(10) (A) For schools that offer grades 10, 11, or 12, inclusive, at local educational agencies, perform an analytical procedure and identify unusual enrollment patterns between consecutive grade levels and pupils that change grade levels during the school year for that school and report as a note that shall not include personally identifiable information for any pupil.

(B) Identify if a pupil advanced to grade 12 without completing a California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress assessment in English language arts/literacy and
 mathematics using pupil cohort data and assessment data and report the number of such pupils as a note. Report the total number of pupils disenrolled from the school after census day, in a note. A local educational agency shall provide the auditor necessary assessment data from the Test Operations Management System or subsequent successor system.

(11) Verify documentation of pupil work products, pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 51747.5.

(c) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting, the Controller shall include a library of sample letters and schedules applicable to the Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting requirements for both school districts and charter schools as a means of guidance
 to auditors.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or educational joint powers authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 1.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the auditor conducting an annual audit pursuant to Section 41020 shall, upon request, provide pertinent financial and compliance information related to the circumstances listed in subdivision (b) to specified entities as follows:

(1) To the county superintendent of schools for a school district or educational joint powers authority within the county superintendent of schools’ jurisdiction.

(2) To the chartering authority of a charter school or to the county superintendent of schools for a charter school if the county superintendent of schools is not the chartering authority.

(3) To the Superintendent and the Controller for any local educational agency.

(b) The circumstances described in subdivision (a) include all of the following:

(1) The local educational agency has a financial audit finding, an audit finding for a material weakness or significant deficiency in internal controls, or a material noncompliance finding, including an apportionment significant audit exception.

(2) The audit of a local educational agency contains an audit opinion other than unmodified.

(3) The audit has included a statement that there is substantial doubt about the local educational agency’s ability to continue as a going concern for a reasonable period of time.

(4) A
 determination has been made that a school district or educational joint powers authority may not be able to meet its obligations of the current or subsequent fiscal year pursuant to Section 42127.6.

(5) There is evidence that a school district is showing fiscal distress under the standards and criteria adopted in Section 33127 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42127.6.

(6) A school district has a negative unrestricted fund balance or negative cash balance pursuant to Section 42127.5.

(7) A school district has received an emergency apportionment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 41325) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(8) The budget of a school district,
 educational joint powers authority, or county superintendent of schools is disapproved or a school district or county superintendent of schools has received a negative certification on any budget or interim financial report, as defined in Sections 1240, 1622, 42127, and 42131, during the current or preceding fiscal year.

(c) Information provided by an auditor to a chartering authority, a county superintendent of schools, the Controller, or the Superintendent pursuant to this section shall be submitted simultaneously to the named school district, educational joint powers authority, charter school, or county superintendent of schools, as applicable, and shall not constitute a violation of auditor-client confidentiality.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 45.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 41020, for the 2019–20 fiscal year, a local educational agency shall provide for an audit by July 15, 2020, and if a local educational agency fails to provide for an audit by July 15, 2020, the county office of education having jurisdiction over the local educational agency shall provide for an audit of the local educational agency by July 31, 2020.
